Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.310

Quieting title to personal property.

Any person or corporation claiming to be the owner of or interested in any tangible or intangible personal property may institute and maintain a suit against any person or corporation also claiming title to or any interest in such property for the purpose of adjudicating the title of the plaintiff to such property, or any interest therein, against any and all adverse claims; removing all such adverse claims as clouds upon the title of the plaintiff and quieting the title of the plaintiff against any and all such adverse claims.

[ 1929 c 100 s 1; RRS s 809-1.]